Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 26 Eminent Domain

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see art. 1, § 32, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no private property shall be taken or damaged for public or private use without just compensation, see art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const.

For provision that the right of eminent domain shall never be so abridged or construed as to prevent the legislature from taking property and franchises of corporations, see art. 10, § 9, Wyo. Const.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Implementation of Land Use Policy: Police Power vs. Eminent Domain,” III Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1968).

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For case note, “REAL PROPERTY — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching A Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: right to condemn property owned or used by private educational, charitable, or religious organization, 80 ALR3d 833.

Eminent domain: validity of appropriation of property for anticipated future use, 80 ALR3d 1085.

Good will as element of damages for condemnation of property on which private business is conducted, 81 ALR3d 198.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks, 18 ALR4th 990.

Eminent domain: industrial park or similar development as public use justifying condemnation of private property, 62 ALR4th 1183.

Abutting owner's right to damages for limitation of access caused by traffic regulation, 15 ALR5th 821.

Measure of damages or compensation in eminent domain as affected by premises being restricted to particular educational, religious, charitable or noncommercial use, 29 ALR5th 36.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain § 1 et seq.

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
112.05 (Matthew Bender).